Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2433
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Shareholders Protection Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 21-2434 to 21-2447 shall be used.

Laws 1988, LB 1110, § 3.